Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3004
Interest in wind or solar resource; restriction
on severance from surface estate.

No interest in
any wind or solar resource
located on a tract of land and associated with the production or potential
production of wind or solar energy on the
tract of land may be severed from the surface estate.

Laws 2009, LB568, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 17.